Missouri, session 2026, HB2512.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 632, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto nine new sections, to
be known as sections 632.700, 632.701, 632.702, 632.703, 632.704, 632.705, 632.706,
632.707, and 632.708, to read as follows:
632.700. Sections 632.700 to 632.708 shall be known as "The Care Before
Predictable Harm Act".
632.701. 1. The general assembly finds that:
(1) The closure of long-term psychiatric institutions without adequate
community treatment has resulted in individuals with severe mental illness being
untreated until crisis and too often treated only through the criminal justice system;
(2) Incarceration is not treatment and forcing individuals to receive mental
health care only after arrest is inhumane and inconsistent with the duty of the state to
provide care for vulnerable citizens;
(3) Families and caregivers are frequently the first to observe deterioration in
individuals with severe mental illness, but current procedures prevent early intervention
until after imminent danger has occurred;
(4) Missouri has a compelling interest in creating a humane and timely pathway
to evaluation and treatment for individuals unable to recognize the need for care, while
respecting due process and using the least restrictive means necessary;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2512 2
(5) Individuals with severe mental illness may experience repeated cycles of
homelessness and emergency care resulting from untreated symptoms, which present a
predictable risk of serious harm; early, evidence-based intervention prevents harm,
supports family stability, and reduces the burden on law enforcement and emergency
medical systems; and
(6) Missouri becomes the first state to replace the "imminent danger" test with a
"predictable harm" standard that allows intervention when a cycle of homelessness and
psychosis creates a clear and preventable risk to life.
2. It is the intent of the general assembly that treatment under sections 632.700
to 632.708 shall be provided in clinical settings and not through the criminal justice
system, that no Missourian should be forced to enter a jail cell in order to access mental
health treatment, and that sections 632.700 to 632.708 establish a statewide structure for
early intervention, including assisted outpatient treatment, short-term stabilization, and
the use of evidence-based long-acting medication when clinically justified.
632.702. As used in sections 632.700 to 632.708, the following terms mean:
(1) "Assisted outpatient treatment", individualized care ordered by a court that
may include therapy, community supports, case management, and medication, including
long-acting injectable antipsychotic medication when medically justified;
(2) "Danger to self or others", a substantial risk of physical harm to the
individual or another person, including inability to provide for basic human needs due
to symptoms of mental illness;
(3) "Least restrictive", the medically appropriate treatment environment that
constitutes the minimum necessary intrusion on the individual's liberty while ensuring
safety;
(4) "Qualified community petitioner":
(a) A licensed social worker, case manager, outreach worker, or hospital social
worker who is employed by a homeless services provider, substance use disorder
treatment program, hospital emergency department, or community mental health
center; or
(b) A member of a mobile crisis response team, street medicine team, or
emergency medical services provider with documented interactions with the individual;
(5) "Qualified petitioner", a spouse, parent, adult child, sibling, legal guardian,
or co-resident caregiver who has provided substantial support to the individual for at
least six months preceding the petition;
(6) "Severe mental illness", schizophrenia spectrum disorder, bipolar disorder
with psychotic features, or other psychiatric disorders resulting in impaired insight and

HB 2512 3
inability to make informed decisions regarding treatment, as documented by a licensed
psychiatrist;
(7) "Severe substance use disorder", a substance use disorder as defined in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, where
symptoms result in impaired judgment, inability to recognize danger, repeated
overdose, or inability to provide for basic needs including shelter and safety.
632.703. 1. A qualified petitioner or qualified community petitioner may file a
verified petition for emergency psychiatric evaluation with the circuit court in the
county where the individual resides.
2. The petition shall include:
(1) (a) Facts indicating the presence of severe mental illness; or
(b) Facts indicating the presence of severe substance use disorder;
(2) Facts that present a predictable risk of serious harm due to homelessness
caused by untreated addiction, including:
(a) Repeated exposure to unsafe conditions; or
(b) A pattern of cycling between homelessness, emergency medical intervention,
and untreated addiction that presents a significant risk of harm due to impaired
judgment or inability to recognize danger;
(3) Facts supporting a finding of danger to self or others or a predictable harm
pattern;
(4) Known history of treatment or hospitalization; and
(5) Supporting documentation, if available.
3. The court shall review the petition within twenty-four hours of filing.
4. If the court finds that the individual meets the criteria under this section, the
court may order the individual to undergo a ninety-six-hour psychiatric evaluation
under section 632.305.
632.704. 1. An evaluation ordered under section 632.703 shall be conducted by a
licensed psychiatrist and shall include appropriate medical testing to rule out
underlying medical or physiological conditions that may mimic psychiatric disorders.
2. During the period of emergency detention and evaluation under sections
632.700 to 632.708, the treating psychiatrist may administer medically appropriate
antipsychotic medication, including long-acting injectable antipsychotic medication,
only if the psychiatrist determines and documents in the medical record that:
(1) The individual presents an imminent danger to self or others, or is gravely
disabled as a result of symptoms of severe mental illness;
(2) The medication is necessary to prevent predictable serious harm, including
circumstances in which the individual:

HB 2512 4
(a) Is threatening to cause harm to self or others; or
(b) Has a history of being unhoused during dangerous circumstances, or a
pattern of cycling between homelessness and emergency care, which presents a
significant risk of harm to self due to impaired judgment, inability to provide for basic
needs, or inability to recognize danger;
(3) The medication represents the least restrictive clinical alternative available to
ensure safety; and
(4) The individual lacks the capacity to make an informed decision regarding
treatment at the time of administration.
3. For purposes of paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section,
"significant risk of harm" includes conditions where the individual's judgment is
impaired by symptoms of severe mental illness such that the individual:
(1) Is unable to recognize unsafe or life-threatening circumstances;
(2) Is unable to provide for basic needs including shelter, clothing, or protection
from the elements;
(3) Is unable to seek medical care or safety without assistance; or
(4) Has repeatedly refused treatment, resulting in a cycle of homelessness and
emergency intervention due to untreated symptoms.
4. Medication administered under this section shall be recorded in the
individual's medical record, including:
(1) Clinical findings supporting dangerousness or grave disability;
(2) Attempts made to obtain voluntary consent;
(3) The basis for determining incapacity;
(4) The name and dosage of the medication administered; and
(5) The clinical rationale for the selection of a long-acting injectable formulation,
if used.
5. The administration of medication under this section shall not extend beyond
the ninety-six-hour emergency detention period, except pursuant to a treatment order
issued under section 632.705.
6. As soon as practicable after admission, the individual shall be advised of the
right to counsel and to communicate with an attorney, family member, or guardian.
7. Medication administered under this section shall not be used as punishment,
for convenience of staff, or as a substitute for appropriate therapeutic interventions.
8. The evaluating psychiatrist shall submit a written report to the court stating
whether the individual:
(1) Has a severe mental illness;
(2) Presents a danger to self or others or a predictable harm pattern;

HB 2512 5
(3) Requires treatment to prevent deterioration; and
(4) Cannot be safely treated through less restrictive means.
632.705. 1. The court shall hold a hearing within seven days of receiving the
evaluation.
2. The individual subject to the petition shall have the right to counsel, to present
evidence, to call witnesses, and to obtain an independent psychiatric evaluation.
3. Upon clear and convincing evidence that the individual meets the criteria
described in section 632.704, the court may order assisted outpatient treatment for a
period not to exceed one hundred eighty days.
4. A treatment order issued under this section may include:
(1) Community mental health services;
(2) Therapy and case management;
(3) Substance use disorder treatment;
(4) Supportive housing placement; and
(5) Administration of long-acting injectable antipsychotic medication, when
medically justified and documented in the clinical record.
5. A treatment order issued under this section shall be the least restrictive means
necessary to address the individual's condition. The order may be renewed only upon a
new hearing and findings under this section.
6. A treatment order issued under this section shall identify the community
treatment provider or clinic responsible for administering court-ordered services,
including long-acting injectable medication when medically justified, and such provider
or clinic shall administer treatment in accordance with section 632.706.
632.706. 1. The department of mental health shall establish a statewide network
of community mental health clinics authorized to administer court-ordered psychiatric
treatment under sections 632.700 to 632.708, including the administration of long-acting
injectable antipsychotic medication.
2. A clinic participating in the statewide network shall not refuse to administer
court-ordered long-acting injectable antipsychotic medication, if the individual lacks
capacity to consent at the time of administration and the medication is medically
justified and represents the least restrictive means available to prevent predictable
serious harm.
3. A clinic administering treatment under this section shall be immune from civil
liability for actions taken in good faith pursuant to a valid court order and in
compliance with the standards established by the department of mental health under
this section.

HB 2512 6
4. Refusal of a clinic to comply with court-ordered treatment under this section
shall be grounds for removal from the statewide network and may result in suspension
or withholding of state funds.
5. The department shall adopt standardized clinical protocols governing the
administration of court-ordered medication under this section, including documentation
and post-administration monitoring.
632.707. 1. False material statements in a petition under section 632.703 shall be
punishable as perjury under section 575.040.
2. Any person who knowingly interferes with the execution of a valid court order
issued under sections 632.700 to 632.708 shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
632.708. The department of mental health shall submit an annual report to the
general assembly summarizing implementation of sections 632.700 to 632.708,
including:
(1) The number of petitions filed;
(2) The number of emergency evaluations ordered;
(3) The number of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment plans issued and
renewed;
(4) The number of long-acting injectable administrations performed under court
order;
(5) Outcomes demonstrating reductions in repeated emergency interventions;
and
(6) Data demonstrating the number of cases in which intervention prevented
predictable serious harm, including hospitalization, incarceration, or death due to
exposure, starvation, or violence.
✔